Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-147
Director of Administrative Services; Department of Correctional Services-made goods; discretionary powers.

The Director of Administrative Services may create an exception from the mandatory provisions of sections 83-144 to 83-152 when in the opinion of the director, the article produced or manufactured does not meet the reasonable requirements of the department, institution, or agency of the state. The Director of Correctional Services may create an exception from the mandatory provisions of sections 83-144 to 83-152 in any case when the requisition made cannot be completely complied with on account of an insufficient supply of the article or supplies required, or otherwise. No such department, institution, or agency of the state shall be allowed to evade the intent and meaning of this section by slight violations from standards adopted by the department, when articles produced or manufactured by it in accordance with its standards are reasonably adapted to the actual needs of the department, institution, or agency.

Laws 1935, c. 183, § 4, p. 679;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-959;

R.S.1943, § 83-147;

Laws 1961, c. 416, § 20, p. 1273;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 30;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 34.